Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Chapter 1. Definitions and General Provisions Relating to the Military Forces

§ 33-1-1.
Definition of terms.

In this chapter, and in Chapters 3, 5, 7, 9 and 11 of this title, the words:

Military forces of the state–Shall mean the organized militia, the state retired list, the state reserve list, and the Mississippi State Guard, and all other components of the militia of the state which may hereafter be organized.

Organized militia–Shall mean the Mississippi National Guard, including the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard, and the Mississippi State Guard when organized, and shall be deemed to include any unit, component, element, headquarters, staff or cadre thereof, as well as any member or members.

Mississippi National Guard–Shall mean that part of the organized militia of this state which is organized, equipped and federally recognized under the provisions of the laws of the United States and of the State of Mississippi relating to the National Guard.

Army National Guard–Shall mean the members of federally recognized units and organizations of the Mississippi National Guard which are a reserve component of the United States Army.

Air National Guard–Shall mean the members of federally recognized units and organizations of the Mississippi National Guard which are a reserve component of the United States Air Force.

Military–Shall include Army, Air and Naval Forces.

Military fund–Shall mean any and all monies appropriated by the Legislature for the support of the militia and such other revenues as may be received or collected by the military department.

Federal recognition or federally recognized–Shall mean acknowledgment by the Secretary of the Air Force or the Secretary of the Army that an individual has been appointed to an authorized grade and position vacancy appropriate to his qualifications in the Air National Guard, or the Army National Guard, and that he meets the prescribed federal requirements for such grade and position; or that the particular unit or organization has been recognized by the Secretary of the Air Force or the Secretary of the Army as a component of the Air National Guard or Army National Guard of the United States.

Unit or organization–Shall mean a single military organization having a mission, function, and a structure prescribed by competent authority.

Active state duty–Shall mean active military duty in other than a training status in or with a force of the organized militia or with the Adjutant General’s Department, upon the orders of the Governor.

State training duty–Shall mean military duty in a training status authorized under Title 32 of the United States Code, Annotated, and regulations issued thereunder.

Service of the United States or active service of the United States–Shall mean any active military duty in the Armed Forces of the United States except duty for training purposes.

Officer–Shall include commissioned officers and warrant officers of the militia of this state unless otherwise specified.

Enlisted man–Shall be understood to designate members of the militia of this state other than officers and warrant officers.

Gender–Words importing the masculine gender only shall apply to female as well as male.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-01; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 1, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-3.
Support by counties and municipalities.

The board of supervisors of any county or the governing authorities of any municipality, either or both, may aid one or more federally recognized units of the Mississippi National Guard, or one or more units of the Mississippi State Guard, by appropriating annually a sum of money to be paid to the commander of each such unit, who shall account for and expend same under and in accordance with such regulations as the Adjutant General shall make. The board of supervisors of any county, the governing authorities of any municipality or the trustees of any school district, or any one or more of them, are further empowered to make such appropriations as they see fit for constructing, reconstructing, repairing, rehabilitating and improving military installations and property for the use of the Mississippi National Guard and Mississippi State Guard.

In all cases where the board of supervisors of counties, the governing authorities of municipalities or the trustees of school districts have, prior to the passage of this chapter, executed leases or conveyances of land for purposes authorized by this title, such leases and conveyances are hereby ratified, confirmed and validated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-121; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 80; Laws, 1980, ch. 337, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 33-1-5.
Exemption from jury duty.

Any member of the Mississippi National Guard on active duty shall be exempt from jury duty upon presenting a current written statement from his superior officer that such jury service will be likely to interfere with his military duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-122; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 81; Laws, 2004, 1st ex. Sess., ch. 1, § 13; Laws, 2006, ch. 437, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2006).

§ 33-1-7.
Exemption from arrest.

No person belonging to the military forces of this state shall be arrested by any civil authority under any civil or criminal process while going to, remaining at or returning from any place at which he may be required to attend military duty except for treason or felony. Service of any such prohibited process shall be void.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-123; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 82, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-9.
Compatibility of holding public office.

Any citizen of this state may accept and hold a commission or warrant in the militia of this state or hold enlisted membership in the militia of this state or a commission in any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States without vacating any civil office, position or commission held by him, and the acceptance or holding of any such commission, warrant or membership and receiving pay therefrom shall not constitute such holding of an office of privilege and trust under the government of this state or of the United States as shall be incompatible with the holding of any civil office, legislative or judicial, or position or commission under the government of this state and receiving the emoluments therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-124; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 83, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-11.
Authority over civilians interfering with militia.

If any person shall interrupt, molest, or insult, by abusive words or behavior, or shall obstruct or interfere with any officer or enlisted man while on duty at any parade, drill or meeting of his military organization, or while engaged in the performance of any other proper military duty, he shall immediately be put under guard, and may be kept, at the discretion of the commissioned officer in charge, until the parade, drill meeting or duty is concluded; and the commissioned officer in charge may commit such person to any police officer or constable of any municipality or beat where such parade, drill, meeting, or duty is being performed, or the sheriff of the county, or his deputy, who shall hold such person for trial before a court having jurisdiction of the place, and any person so offending shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment not to exceed thirty (30) days, or both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-125; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 84, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-13.
Discrimination against uniform.

Any proprietor, manager or employee of a theater, hotel, restaurant, or any other public place, who shall make or cause to be made any discrimination against any person lawfully wearing the uniform of the Armed Forces of the United States of America or of the State of Mississippi, because of the uniform worn, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-126; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 85, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-15.
Discrimination by private employers.

Any person, firm or corporation who alone, or in conjunction with others, wilfully deprives a member of any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any former member of the service of the United States discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, of his employment, prevents his being employed by himself or another, or discriminates in any of the conditions or emoluments of his employment because of his membership in such reserve component, or former membership in such service; or, by threat of injury to him, physical or otherwise, dissuades or attempts to dissuade any person from enlistment, or acceptance of a warrant or commission, in any reserve or active component of the Armed Forces of the United States shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-127; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 86; Laws, 1974, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 492 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1991).

§ 33-1-17.
Discrimination by associations.

No association or corporation, constituted or organized for the purpose of promoting the success of the trade, employment or business of the members thereof, shall by any constitution, rule, bylaw, resolution, vote or regulation discriminate against any member of any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any former member of the service of the United States discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, because of such membership, or such former membership, in respect to the eligibility of such member, or such former member, in such association or corporation, or in respect to his rights to retain said last mentioned membership. Any person who aids in enforcing any such provisions against a member of such reserve component, or such former member of the service, with intent to discriminate against him because of such membership, or such former membership, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-128; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 87; Laws, 1974, ch. 473, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 492 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1991).

§ 33-1-19.
Re-employment rights.

Any person who is a member of any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, or former member of the service of the United States discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, who, in order to perform duties or receive training with the Armed Forces of the United States, or of the State of Mississippi or any other state (including active state duty, state-training duty or any other military duty authorized under Title 10 or Title 32 of the United States Code), leaves a position, other than a temporary position, in the employ of any employer, and who shall give evidence of the satisfactory completion of such duty or training, and who is still qualified to perform the duties of such position, shall be entitled to be restored to his previous or a similar position, in the same status, pay and seniority, and such period of absence for military duty or training shall be construed as an absence with leave but may be without pay.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-129; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 88; Laws, 1974, ch. 473, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 432, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1994); Laws, 2018, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 33-1-21.
Officers and employees granted leave.

All officers and employees of any department, agency, or institution of the State of Mississippi, or of any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, who shall be members of any of the reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, or former members of the service of the United States discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, shall be entitled to leave of absence from their respective duties, without loss of pay, time, annual leave, or efficiency rating, on all days during which they shall be ordered to duty to participate in training at encampments, field exercises, maneuvers, outdoor target practice, or for other exercises, for periods not to exceed fifteen (15) days, and all such officers and employees shall for such periods in excess of fifteen (15) days, be entitled to leave of absence from their respective duties without loss of time, annual leave, or efficiency rating until relieved from duty, and shall when relieved from such duty, be restored to the positions held by them when ordered to duty, or a position of like seniority, status and pay; provided that such person: (1) when discharged or released from the armed forces shall have received a certificate of satisfactory completion of service, (2) shall be still qualified to perform the duties of such position, (3) shall make application for re-employment within ninety (90) days after the passage of this chapter or within ninety (90) days after such person is relieved from such training and service or released from hospitalization for a period of not more than one (1) year for causes attributable to such services. Any person restored to a position under the above provisions shall not be discharged from such position without cause within (1) year after restoration. The fact that there has been a change of administration affecting any position with the State of Mississippi, or any county, city, town, political subdivision, or any state institution thereof shall in no manner affect or deny to such person his former position, and regardless of any limitation on the number of employees, such person shall be re-employed. The provisions of this section do not apply to any officer elected by the vote of the electors of the state, county, municipality, or political subdivisions, when the statutory or constitutional term of the office has expired upon the discharge of such person from military service, but this section does grant re-employment rights to all other officers and employees of the State of Mississippi, or of any county, municipality, or political subdivision when ordered to military duty.

In the event the persons referred to in the foregoing subsection are not reinstated, as therein required, upon application by any such person to the county attorney of the county in which he was employed, or to the district attorney of the district in which he was employed, such attorney applied to shall act as the attorney for such person and shall institute such action as may be necessary to enforce compliance with the provisions of said subsection, and no fees or court costs shall be taxed against the person applying for benefits thereunder.

Insofar as any of the provisions of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this section shall be considered controlling, and any other acts or parts of acts in conflict herewith are hereby repealed insofar as they are in conflict with this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-130; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 89; Laws, 1974, ch. 473, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1974).

§ 33-1-23.
Assignment of pay.

No assignment of pay by any officer or enlisted man of the organized militia shall be valid, except as may be otherwise provided by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-131; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 90, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-25.
Right of way for military forces.

All units of the military forces of the state shall have the right of way over all other traffic except emergency vehicles and vehicles carrying the United States mail when travelling over any street or highway of this state. All members of the military forces of this state and the vehicles occupied by them shall be allowed to pass free through all toll gates and over all bridges and ferries when performing any military duties or going to or returning from any place set for the performance of such duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-132; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 91, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-27.
Wounded, disabled or injured members of the military forces of Mississippi.

Every member of the military forces of this state who shall be wounded, disabled or injured, or who shall contract any disease or illness, in line of duty when in the service of this state on active state duty shall be entitled to and shall receive, or be reimbursed for, hospitalization, rehospitalization, and medical and surgical care in a hospital and at his home appropriate for the treatment of such wounding, disability, injury, disease or illness, and necessary transportation incident thereto so long as such wounding, disability, injury, disease or illness exists, and shall receive the same pay and allowance whether in money or in kind, to which he was entitled at the time when the injury was incurred or the disease or illness contracted, during the period of his disability but not for more than a total of twelve (12) months after the end of his tour of duty. In the event of his death in such cases, his estate shall be entitled to any reimbursement and compensation to which the deceased would have been entitled, to his accrued pay and allowances, and reimbursement for actual funeral expenses not to exceed the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). Such payments to the estate, as well as the cost of carrying out the other provisions of this section, shall be paid out of the military fund in the same manner provided for other expenditure of state funds. However, no compensation or reimbursement shall be paid in any case where the same is payable under the provisions of any federal law or regulation.

The Adjutant General shall administer the provisions of this section and shall prescribe such rules and regulations not inconsistent with the law as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and the decision as to whether any wounding, disability, injury, disease, illness or death is in line of duty or as a result thereof, shall be made by the Adjutant General after proper investigation and hearing pursuant to such regulations as he may prescribe. Further, the Adjutant General shall have power to make interagency agreements or contracts with any agency of the state government to carry out the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall be in no way construed to be a gratuity but shall be construed to be compensation for services for which each member of the military forces of this state shall be deemed to have bargained for and considered as a condition of his enlistment or appointment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-89; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 60, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-29.
Organized militia may elect to come within provisions of Workers’ Compensation Law.

The organized militia of the State of Mississippi, also known as the Mississippi National Guard, may elect by proper action to come within the provision of the Mississippi Workmen’s Compensation Law, and in such event shall notify the workmen’s compensation commission of such action. After having made such an election, the said Mississippi National Guard may be a self-insurer without the requirement of paying the registration fee as required by Section 71-3-101 of the Workmen’s Compensation Law and without the requirement of filing a self-insurer bond; and may make payment of compensation benefits from any appropriations or funds available to the Mississippi Military Department or any subdivision thereof, provided that such benefits shall be paid only for injuries sustained as a direct result of active military service for the State of Mississippi by direction of an executive order of the Governor of the State of Mississippi. For the purpose of determining the average weekly wages of the person entitled to benefits herein, said wages shall be computed on the basis of his earnings in civilian life or on the basis of his current military pay, whichever shall be greater.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-161; Laws, 1964, ch. 476, eff from and after July 1, 1964.

§ 33-1-31.
Unlawful military-type organizations.

It shall be unlawful for any body of men whatsoever, other than the regularly organized armed militia of this state, the Armed Forces of the United States, and the students of public or of regularly chartered educational institutions where military science is a prescribed part of the course of instruction and color guards or ceremonial firing squads of veterans organizations chartered by acts of congress, to associate themselves together as a military organization for drill or parade in public with firearms in this state, without special license from the Governor for each occasion. Application for such license must be approved by the mayor and board of aldermen or commissioners of the town or city where such organization may propose to parade. Any person or persons participating in such unlawful association shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction of same shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six months (6) or by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or both fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court. The Governor may permit the passage through or the attendance in the state of the organized militia of other states for the purpose of attending joint maneuvers, rifle competitions, or for such other purposes as he may deem proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-32; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 21, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-33.
Civilian guards on military facilities and reservations; peace officer powers for designated personnel of military police units.

The civilian guards employed by the military department, whether paid by state appropriations, federal funds, or other authorized funds, or any combination thereof, and assigned to duties of safeguarding personal and real property belonging to the state or United States or government mixed properties or personal properties belonging to officers and men of the National Guard or of the employees of the military department are hereby given peace officer powers of a constable on the military facilities and reservations to which such civilian guards are assigned.

During periods of annual training, the Adjutant General may designate personnel of military police units to have peace officer powers of a constable on all military facilities, airfields, or reservations belonging to the Mississippi National Guard including, but not limited to, Camp McCain, Grenada, Mississippi, Camp Shelby, Hattiesburg, Mississippi, and the Air National Guard Training Site, Gulfport, Mississippi, Key Field, Meridian, Mississippi, Thompson Field, Jackson, Mississippi, and Hawkins Field, Jackson, Mississippi, to supplement the civilian guards in subsection (1) above.

The Adjutant General may designate civilian guard employee duties to be of such a nature as to require the employee to meet the requirements established by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training for law enforcement officers. For purposes of enforcement, these civilian guard employees shall have the powers of law enforcement officers on the military facilities and reservations to which assigned. The Adjutant General, Mississippi Military Department, the Mississippi National Guard and any designated civilian guard employee including, but not limited to, peace officers and armed or unarmed civilian guards, shall have discretion in the performance of their duties and shall be immune from liability as provided for in Section 11-46-1 et seq. Monies from the State General Fund may be utilized for the training of these officers at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-103.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 387, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 330; Laws, 2003, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 33-1-35.
Prior tenures, enlistments, rights and privileges preserved.

Nothing contained in this chapter, and in chapters 3, 5, 7, 9 and 11 of this title, shall be construed to affect the appointment, enlistment, tenure in office, period of enlistment, rights, privileges, immunities, compensation, emoluments, or other rights of the Adjutant General, commissioned officers, warrant officers, or enlisted men of the Army and Air National Guard of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-151; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 94, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-37.
Prior offenses not abolished.

All offenses committed and all penalties, forfeitures, fines or liabilities incurred prior to June 1, 1966 under any law embraced in or modified, changed, or repealed by the act enacting this chapter and Chapters 3, 5, 7, 9 and 11 of this title may be prosecuted, punished and enforced, and action thereon may be completed, in the same manner and with the same effect as may have been properly done under such prior law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-152; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 95, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-1-39.
Extension of professional license issued active duty military personnel; qualification for extension; fees.

A professional license issued pursuant to any provision of Title 73 to any member of the Mississippi National Guard or the United States Armed Forces Reserves shall not expire while the member is serving on federal active duty and shall be extended for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days after his return from federal active duty. If the license is renewed during the ninety-day period after his return from federal active duty, the member shall only be responsible for normal fees and activities relating to renewal of the license and shall not be charged any additional costs such as, but not limited to, late fees or delinquency fees. The member shall present to the authority issuing the professional license a copy of his official military orders or a written verification from the member’s commanding officer before the end of the ninety-day period in order to qualify for the extension.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 309, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 8, 2007).